Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-736
School books; contracts with members of combination or trust; effect.

Any contract entered into under the provisions of section 79-734 with any publisher who becomes a party to any combination or trust for the purpose of raising the price of school textbooks shall, at the option of the school board or board of education of the district using such books, become null and void.

Laws 1891, c. 46, § 5, p. 335;

R.S.1913, § 6918;

C.S.1922, § 6502;

C.S.1929, § 79-1805;

R.S.1943, § 79-1805;

Laws 1947, c. 283, § 2, p. 891;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 158, p. 745;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,120;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 410.